Utah statutes.
41-3-210.   License holders -- Prohibitions and requirements.
(1)  The holder of any license issued under this chapter may not:
(a)  intentionally publish, display, or circulate any advertising that is
misleading or inaccurate in any material fact or that misrepresents any of the
products sold, manufactured, remanufactured, handled, or furnished by a
licensee;
(b)  intentionally publish, display, or circulate any advertising without
identifying the seller as the licensee by including in the advertisement the
full name under which the licensee is licensed or the licensee's number
assigned by the division;
(c)  violate this chapter or the rules made by the administrator;
(d)  violate any law of the state respecting commerce in motor vehicles or any
rule respecting commerce in motor vehicles made by any licensing or regulating
authority of the state;
(e)  engage in business as a new motor vehicle dealer, special equipment
dealer, used motor vehicle dealer, motor vehicle crusher, or body shop without
having in effect a bond as required in this chapter;
(f)  act as a dealer, dismantler, crusher, manufacturer, transporter,
remanufacturer, or body shop without maintaining a principal place of
business;
(g)  engage in a business respecting the selling or exchanging of new or new
and used motor vehicles for which he is not licensed, including selling or
exchanging a new motor vehicle for which the licensee does not have a
franchise, but this Subsection (1)(g) does not apply to a special equipment
dealer who sells a new special equipment motor vehicle with a gross vehicle
weight of 12,000 or more pounds after installing special equipment on the
motor vehicle;
(h)  dismantle or transport to a crusher for crushing or other disposition any
motor vehicle without first obtaining a dismantling or junk permit under
Section 41-1a-1009, 41-1a-1010, or 41-1a-1011;
(i)  as a new motor vehicle dealer, special equipment dealer, or used motor
vehicle dealer fail to give notice of sales or transfers as required in
Section 41-3-301;
(j)  advertise or otherwise represent, or knowingly allow to be advertised or
represented on his behalf or at his place of business, that no down payment is
required in connection with the sale of a motor vehicle when a down payment is
required and the buyer is advised or induced to finance a down payment by a
loan in addition to any other loan financing the remainder of the purchase
price of the motor vehicle;
(k)  as a crusher, crush or shred a motor vehicle brought to the crusher
without obtaining proper evidence of ownership of the motor vehicle; proper
evidence of ownership is a certificate of title endorsed according to law or a
dismantling or junk permit issued under Section 41-1a-1009, 41-1a-1010, or
41-1a-1011;
(l)  as a manufacturer or remanufacturer assemble a motor vehicle that does
not comply with construction, safety, or vehicle identification number
standards fixed by law or rule of any licensing or regulating authority;
(m)  as anyone other than a salesperson licensed under this chapter, be
present on a dealer  display space and contact prospective customers to
promote the sale of the dealer's vehicles;
(n)  sell, display for sale, or offer for sale motor vehicles at any location
other than the principal place of business or additional places of business
licensed under this chapter; this provision is construed to prevent dealers,
salespersons, or any other representative of a dealership from selling,
displaying, or offering motor vehicles for sale from their homes or other
unlicensed locations;
(o) (i)  as a dealer, dismantler, body shop, or manufacturer, maintain a
principal place of business or additional place of business that shares any
common area with a business or activity not directly related to motor vehicle
commerce; or
(ii)  maintain any places of business that share any common area with another
dealer, dismantler, body shop, or manufacturer;
(p)  withhold delivery of license plates obtained by the licensee on behalf of
a customer for any reason, including nonpayment of any portion of the vehicle
purchase price or down payment;
(q)  issue a temporary permit for any vehicle that has not been sold by the
licensee;
(r)  alter a temporary permit in any manner;
(s)  operate any principal place of business or additional place of business
in a location that does not comply with local ordinances, including zoning
ordinances;
(t)  sell, display for sale, offer for sale, or exchange any new motor vehicle
if the licensee does not:
(i)  have a new motor vehicle dealer's license under Section 41-3-202; and
(ii)  possess a franchise from the manufacturer of the new motor vehicle sold,
displayed for sale, offered for sale, or exchanged by the licensee; or
(u)  as a new motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer, encourage or
conspire with any person who has not obtained a salesperson's license to
solicit for prospective purchasers.
(2) (a)  If a new motor vehicle is constructed in more than one stage, such as
a motor home, ambulance, or van conversion, the licensee shall advertise,
represent, sell, and exchange the vehicle as the make designated by the final
stage manufacturer, except in those specific situations where the licensee
possesses a franchise from the initial or first stage manufacturer, presumably
the manufacturer of the motor vehicle's chassis.
(b)  Sales of multiple stage manufactured motor vehicles shall include the
transfer to the purchaser of a valid manufacturer's statement or certificate
of origin from each manufacturer under Section 41-3-301.
(3)  Each licensee, except salespersons, shall maintain and make available for
inspection by peace officers and employees of the division:
(a)  a record of every motor vehicle bought, or exchanged by the licensee or
received or accepted by the licensee for sale or exchange;
(b)  a record of every used part or used accessory bought or otherwise
acquired;
(c)  a record of every motor vehicle bought or otherwise acquired and wrecked
or dismantled by the licensee;
(d)  all buyers' orders, contracts, odometer statements, temporary permit
records, financing records, and all other documents related to the purchase,
sale, or consignment of motor vehicles; and
(e)  a record of the name and address of the person to whom any motor vehicle
or motor vehicle body, chassis, or motor vehicle engine is sold or otherwise
disposed of and a description of the motor vehicle by year, make, and vehicle
identification number.
(4)  Each licensee required by this chapter to keep records shall:
(a)  be kept by the licensee at least for five years; and
(b)  furnish copies of those records upon request to any peace officer or
employee of the division during reasonable business hours.
(5)  A manufacturer, distributor, distributor representative, or factory
representative may not induce or attempt to induce by means of coercion,
intimidation, or discrimination any dealer to:
(a)  accept delivery of any motor vehicle, parts, or accessories or any other
commodity or commodities, including advertising material not ordered by the
dealer;
(b)  order or accept delivery of any motor vehicle with special features,
appliances, accessories, or equipment not included in the list price of the
motor vehicle as publicly advertised by the manufacturer;
(c)  order from any person any parts, accessories, equipment, machinery,
tools, appliances, or any other commodity;
(d)  enter into an agreement with the manufacturer, distributor, distributor
representative, or factory representative of any of them, or to do any other
act unfair to the dealer by threatening to cancel any franchise or contractual
agreement between the manufacturer, distributor, distributor branch, or
factory branch and the dealer;
(e)  refuse to deliver to any dealer having a franchise or contractual
arrangement for the retail sale of new and unused motor vehicles sold or
distributed by the manufacturer, distributor, distributor branch or factory
branch, any motor vehicle, publicly advertised for immediate delivery within
60 days after the dealer's order is received; or
(f)  unfairly, without regard to the equities of the dealer, cancel the
franchise of any motor vehicle dealer; the nonrenewal of a franchise or
selling agreement without cause is a violation of this subsection and is an
unfair cancellation.
(6)  A dealer may not assist an unlicensed dealer or salesperson in unlawful
activity through active or passive participation in sales, or by allowing use
of his facilities or dealer license number, or by any other means.
(7) (a)  The holder of any new motor vehicle dealer license issued under this
chapter may not sell any new motor vehicle to:
(i)  another dealer licensed under this chapter who does not hold a valid
franchise for the make of new motor vehicles sold, unless the selling dealer
licenses and titles the new motor vehicle to the purchasing dealer; or
(ii)  any motor vehicle leasing or rental company located within this state,
or who has any branch office within this state, unless the dealer licenses and
titles the new motor vehicle to the purchasing, leasing, or rental company.
(b)  Subsection (7)(a)(i) does not apply to the sale of a new incomplete motor
vehicle with a gross vehicle weight of 12,000 or more pounds to a special
equipment dealer licensed under this chapter.
(8)  A dealer licensed under this chapter may not take on consignment any new
motor vehicle from anyone other than a new motor vehicle dealer, factory, or
distributor who is licensed and franchised to distribute or sell that make of
motor vehicle in this or any other state.
(9)  A body shop licensed under this chapter may not assist an unlicensed body
shop in unlawful activity through active or passive means or by allowing use
of its facilities, name, body shop number, or by any other means.
(10)  A used motor vehicle dealer licensed under this chapter may not
advertise, offer for sale, or sell a new motor vehicle that has been driven
less than 7,500 miles by obtaining a title only to the vehicle and
representing it as a used motor vehicle.
(11) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (11)(c), or in cases of undue
hardship or emergency as provided by rule by the division, a dealer or
salesperson licensed under this chapter may not, on consecutive days of
Saturday and Sunday, sell, offer for sale, lease, or offer for lease a motor
vehicle.
(b)  Each day a motor vehicle is sold, offered for sale, leased, or offered
for lease in violation of Subsection (11)(a) and each motor vehicle sold,
offered for sale, leased, or offered for lease in violation of Subsection
(11)(a) shall constitute a separate offense.
(c)  The provisions of Subsection (11)(a) shall not apply to a dealer
participating in a trade show or exhibition if:
(i)  there are five or more dealers participating in the trade show or
exhibition; and
(ii)  the trade show or exhibition takes place at a location other than the
principal place of business of one of the dealers participating in the trade
show or exhibition.
(12)  For purposes of imposing the sales and use tax under Title 59, Chapter
12, Sales and Use Tax Act, a licensee issuing a temporary permit under Section
41-3-302 shall separately identify the fees required by Title 41, Chapter 1a,
Motor Vehicle Act.
(13) (a)  A dismantler or dealer engaged in the business of dismantling motor
vehicles for the sale of parts or salvage shall identify any vehicles or
equipment used by the dismantler or dealer for transporting parts or salvage
on the highways.
(b)  The identification required under Subsection (13)(a) shall:
(i)  include the name, address, and license number of the dismantler or
dealer; and
(ii)  be conspicuously displayed on both sides of the vehicle or equipment in
clearly legible letters and numerals not less than two inches in height.
